Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1433
Waiver of landlord's right to terminate.

Acceptance of rent with knowledge of a default by tenant or acceptance of performance by the tenant that varies from the terms of the rental agreement or rules or regulations subsequently adopted by the landlord constitutes a waiver of his right to terminate the rental agreement for that breach, unless otherwise agreed after the breach has occurred.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 33.